Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1516
Responsibility for release or third-party claim; avoidance; prohibited; when.

Except as provided in section 81-15,124.05, no responsible person may avoid responsibility under state law for a release or third-party claim by means of a conveyance of any right, title, or interest in real property or by any indemnification, hold-harmless, or similar agreement. This section shall not be construed to:

(1) Prohibit a responsible person from entering into an agreement by which the person is insured or is a member of a risk retention group and is thereby indemnified for part or all of the liability;

(2) Prohibit the enforcement of an insurance, hold-harmless, or indemnification agreement; or

(3) Bar a cause of action brought by a responsible person or by an insurer or guarantor, whether by right of subrogation or otherwise.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 16;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 1.